ja: ペット・ペット用品 > ペット用品 > ペット用ノミ対策: ノミ・ダニ取り首輪; ノミ・ダニ取り噴霧器; ノミ・ダニ取りシャンプー; ノミ・ダニ予防スプレー; ノミ取り櫛; 内服薬; スポットトリートメント
pl: Zwierzęta i artykuły dla zwierząt > Artykuły dla zwierząt > Preparaty na pchły i kleszcze dla zwierząt: Obroże na pchły i kleszcze; Aerozole fogger na pchły i kleszcze; Szampony na pchły i kleszcze; Spraye na pchły i kleszcze; Grzebienie przeciwpchelne; Leki doustne; Leki stosowane miejscowo
ru: Животные и товары для питомцев > Товары для домашних животных > Средства для защиты от блох и клещей: Ошейники от блох и клещей; Распылители от блох и клещей; Шампуни от блох и клещей; Спреи от блох и клещей; Гребни для вычесывания блох; Препараты для приема внутрь; Средства для локальной обработки
sk-SK: Potreby pre zvieratá a domácich miláčikov > Potreby pre domácich miláčikov > Prípravky proti blchám a kliešťom: Obojky proti blchám a kliešťom; Ochranné spreje proti blchám a kliešťom; Šampóny proti blchám a kliešťom; Spreje proti blchám a kliešťom; Hrebene na blchy; Perorálny liek; Bodové ošetrenie
nl: Dieren > Benodigdheden voor huisdieren > Bestrijdingsmiddelen tegen vlooien en teken bij huisdieren: Halsbanden tegen vlooien en teken; Vernevelaars tegen vlooien en teken; Shampoo's tegen vlooien en teken; Sprays tegen vlooien en teken; Kammen tegen vlooien; Orale medicatie; Spotbehandelingen
da: Dyr og tilbehør til kæledyr > Tilbehør til kæledyr > Loppemidler og tægemidler til kæledyr: Loppe- og flåthalsbånd; Loppe- og flåtfjernere; Loppe- og flåtshampooer; Loppe- og flåtspray; Loppekamme; Oral medicin; Pletbehandlinger
zh-TW: 動物/寵物補給品 > 寵物用品 > 寵物除蚤劑: 除蚤和壁蝨項圈; 水煙式除蚤和壁蝨劑; 除蚤和壁蝨洗毛精; 除蚤和壁蝨噴霧; 除蚤梳; 口服藥; 局部藥劑
en: Animals & Pet Supplies > Pet Supplies > Pet Flea & Tick Control: Flea & Tick Collars; Flea & Tick Foggers; Flea & Tick Shampoos; Flea & Tick Sprays; Flea Combs; Oral Medication; Spot Treatments
de: Tiere & Tierbedarf > Haustierbedarf > Floh- & Zeckenschutzmittel: Floh- und Zeckenhalsbänder; Floh- und Zecken-Foggger (Vernebler); Floh- und Zeckenshampoos; Floh- und Zeckensprays; Flohkämme; Orale Medikamente; Punktuelle Behandlungen
ro-RO: Animale și articole pentru animale de companie > Articole pentru animale de companie > Controlul puricilor și căpușelor animalelor de companie: Zgărzi pentru purici și căpușe; Dispozitive pentru pulverizarea substanțelor anti-purici și anti-căpușe; Șampoane anti-purici și anti-căpușe; Sprayuri anti-purici și anti-căpușe; Piepteni pentru purici; Medicație orală; Tratamente aplicate local
cs: Chovatelství > Potřeby pro domácí zvířata > Veterinární přípravky proti blechám a klíšťatům: Obojky proti blechám a klíšťatům; Mlhovače proti blechám a klíšťatům; Šampóny proti blechám a klíšťatům; Spreje proti blechám a klíšťatům; Hřebeny na blechy; Perorální léčiva; Bodová ošetření
es: Productos para mascotas y animales > Productos para mascotas > Control de pulgas y garrapatas en mascotas: Collares contra pulgas y garrapatas; Nebulizadores contra pulgas y garrapatas; Champús contra pulgas y garrapatas; Aerosoles contra pulgas y garrapatas; Peines para pulgas; Medicación oral; Tratamientos localizados
sv: Djur och tillbehör till husdjur > Tillbehör till husdjur > Lopp- och fästingskydd för husdjur: Lopp- och fästinghalsband; Lopp- och fästingdimmare; Lopp- och fästingschampon; Lopp- och fästingsprayer; Loppkammar; Oralmedicinering; Punktbehandlingar
it: Articoli per animali > Animali domestici - Articoli > Controllo pulci e zecche animali domestici: Collari antipulci e zecche; Nebulizzatori per pulci e zecche; Shampoo per pulci e zecche; Spray per pulci e zecche; Pettini antipulci; Farmaco orale; Trattamenti localizzati
hr-HR: Životinje i potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Potrepštine za kućne ljubimce > Kontrola buha i krpelja: Ogrlice protiv buha i krpelja; Zamagljivači protiv buha i krpelja; Šamponi protiv buha i krpelja; Sprejevi protiv buha i krpelja; Češljevi protiv buha; Oralni lijekovi; Liječenje dermatitisa
nb: Produkter til dyr og husdyr > Husdyrprodukter > Loppe- og flåttkontroll for husdyr: Loppe- og flåtthalsbånd; Loppe- og flåttfoggere; Loppe- og flåttsjampoer; Loppe- og flåttspray; Loppekammer; Oral medisinering; Flekkbehandlinger
sl-SI: Živali in pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Pripomočki za hišne ljubljenčke > Sredstva proti bolham in klopom: Ovratnice proti bolham in klopom; Meglice proti bolham in klopom; Šamponi proti bolham in klopom; Pršila proti bolham in klopom; Glavniki proti bolham; Peroralna zdravila; Lokalna zdravila
pt-PT: Artigos para animais e animais estimação > Artigos para animais > Controlo de pulgas e carraças para animais de estimação: Coleiras contra pulgas e carraças; Nebulizadores contra pulgas e carraças; Champôs contra pulgas e carraças; Pulverizadores contra pulgas e carraças; Pentes para pulgas; Medicação oral; Tratamentos localizados
bg-BG: Артикули за животни и домашни любимци > Артикули за домашни любимци > Средства срещу бълхи и кърлежи: Нашийници против бълхи и кърлежи; Средства за замъгляване против бълхи и кърлежи; Шампоани против бълхи и кърлежи; Спрейове против бълхи и кърлежи; Гребени против бълхи; Лекарства през устата; Средства за локална обработка
vi: Đồ dùng cho động vật & thú cưng > Đồ dùng cho thú cưng > Phòng và điều trị bọ & rận cho thú cưng: Vòng cổ trị ve rận; Bình phun trị ve rận; Dầu gội trị ve rận; Bình xịt trị ve rận; Lược chải bọ chét; Thuốc uống; Thuốc chấm trực tiếp tại chỗ
el: Ζώα και προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Προμήθειες για κατοικίδια ζώα > Έλεγχος ψύλλων και τσιμπουριών για κατοικίδια ζώα: Κολάρα κατά των ψύλλων & τσιμπουριών; Σπρέι καπνού κατά των ψύλλων & τσιμπουριών; Σαμπουάν κατά των ψύλλων & τσιμπουριών; Σπρέι κατά των ψύλλων και τσιμπουριών; Χτένες για ψύλλους; Φάρμακο από το στόμα; Θεραπείες κηλίδων
zh-CN: 动物/宠物用品 > 宠物用品 > 宠物除虫防虫: 除虫防虫项圈; 除虫防虫喷雾剂; 除虫防虫洗发水; 除虫防虫喷剂; 跳蚤梳; 口服药物; 体外驱虫滴剂
fr: Animaux et articles pour animaux de compagnie > Articles pour animaux de compagnie > Traitements anti-puces et anti-tiques: Colliers anti-puces et anti-tiques; Brumisateurs anti-puces et tiques; Shampoings anti-puces et anti-tiques; Sprays anti-puces et anti-tiques; Peignes anti-puces; Médicaments oraux; Traitements localisés
tr: Hayvanlar ve Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Ürünleri > Evcil Hayvan Pire ve Kene Kontrolü: Pire ve Kene Tasmaları; Pire ve Kene Sisleyiciler; Pire ve Kene Şampuanları; Pire ve Kene Spreyleri; Pire Tarağı; Ağızdan İlaç; Leke Tedavileri
fi: Eläinten ja lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikkieläinten tarvikkeet > Lemmikin kirppujen ja punkkien hoito: Kirppu- ja punkkipannat; Kirppu- ja punkkisumuttimet; Kirppu- ja punkkishampoot; Kirppu- ja punkkisuihkeet; Kirppukammat; Suun kautta otettavat lääkkeet; Pistehoidot
pt-BR: Animais e produtos para animais de estimação > Suprimentos para animais de estimação > Controle de pulgas e carrapatos: Coleiras contra pulgas e carrapatos; Nebulizadores contra pulgas e carrapatos; Shampoos contra pulgas e carrapatos; Sprays contra pulgas e carrapatos; Pentes contra pulgas; Medicação oral; Tratamentos pontuais
lt-LT: Gyvūnai ir prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Prekės naminiams gyvūnams > Naminių gyvūnų blusų ir erkių kontrolė: Antkakliai nuo blusų ir erkių; Aerozoliai nuo blusų ir erkių; Šampūnai nuo blusų ir erkių; Purškalai nuo blusų ir erkių; Blusų šukos; Geriamieji vaistai; Taškinis gydymas
ko: 동물/반려동물 용품 > 반려동물 용품 > 반려동물용 벼룩/진드기 퇴치용품: 벼룩/진드기 방지 목줄; 벼룩/진드기 분무기; 벼룩/진드기 샴푸; 벼룩/진드기 스프레이; 벼룩용 빗; 경구용 약물; 국부용 치료제
th: อุปกรณ์สำหรับสัตว์และสัตว์เลี้ยง > อุปกรณ์สัตว์เลี้ยง > ผลิตภัณฑ์ควบควมหมัดและเห็บในสัตว์เลี้ยง: ปลอกคอกำจัดเห็บและหมัด; เครื่องพ่นหมอกกำจัดเห็บหมัด; แชมพูกำจัดเห็บหมัด; สเปรย์กำจัดเห็บหมัด; หวีป้องกันหมัด; ยารับประทาน; การรักษาเฉพาะจุด
hu: Állatok és kisállatkellékek > Háziállat-kellékek > Háziállatbolha- és -kullancs-szabályozás: Bolha- és kullancsnyakörvek; Bolha- és kullancsirtó fújószerek; Bolha- és kullancssamponok; Bolha- és kullancs spray-k; Bolhafésűk; Orális gyógyszeres kezelés; Foltkezelések